Maryland, session 2025, HB0753.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Comptroller shall conduct a study on the feasibility and fiscal impact of a
State baby bond account program.
(b) The study required under subsection (a) of this section shall identify:
(1) current baby bond programs operated in other jurisdictions;
(2) the appropriate State entity to administer a State baby bond account
program and how that entity may implement the program;
(3) the estimated costs for the State, including funding options;
(4) the eligibility criteria for participation in a State baby bond account
program;
(5) the current economic, social, and political factors that may affect a baby
bond account program’s implementation, including information on how the program may:
(i) close wealth gaps in the State; and
(ii) help Marylanders:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0753*

HOUSE BILL 753
1. pay for college;
2. buy homes; and
3. start businesses; and
(6) the fiscal impact a State baby bond account program would have on the
State.
(c) On or before June 1, 2026, the Comptroller shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.